Nevada, session 83, AB548.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 488.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.075 1. The owner of each power-driven vessel requiring
numbering by this State shall file an application for a number and
for a certificate of ownership with the Department on forms
approved by it accompanied by:
(a) Proof of payment of Nevada sales or use tax as evidenced by
proof of sale by a Nevada dealer or by a certificate of use tax paid
issued by the Department of Taxation, or by proof of exemption
from those taxes as provided in NRS 372.320.
(b) Such evidence of ownership as the Department may require.
 The Department shall not issue a number, a certificate of number
or a certificate of ownership until this evidence is presented to it.
2. The application must be signed by the owner of the power-
driven vessel and must be accompanied by:
-
*AB548*

– 3 –
(a) A fee of $20 for the certificate of ownership; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
488.125, [an] the appropriate annual fee [according to the following
schedule as determined] established by the Commission pursuant
to subsection 4. [straight line length which is measured from the tip
of the bow to the back of the transom of the power-driven vessel:

Less than 13 feet ................................................................. $20
13 feet or more but less than 18 feet ..................................... 25
18 feet or more but less than 22 feet ..................................... 40
22 feet or more but less than 26 feet ..................................... 55
26 feet or more but less than 31 feet ..................................... 75
31 feet or more ................................................................. 100]

3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all fees
received by the Department under the provisions of this chapter
must be deposited in the Wildlife Account in the State General Fund
and, except as otherwise provided in NRS 488.536, may be
expended only for projects to increase education concerning and
access to boating and the administration and enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter [.] and the provisions of title 45 of NRS,
including, without limitation, any costs incurred when assisting a
law enforcement agency in the enforcement of the laws of this
State that are within the jurisdiction of a game warden. On or
before [December] July 31 of each year, the Department shall
deposit with the State Education Fund [50 percent of each fee
collected according to the length of] $800,000 from the [power-
driven vessel for every power-driven vessel registered.] fees
received by the Department in the previous fiscal year under the
provisions of this section. Upon receipt of the application in
approved form, the Department shall enter the application upon the
records of its office and issue to the applicant a certificate of number
stating the number awarded to the power-driven vessel, a certificate
of ownership stating the same information and the name and address
of the registered owner and the legal owner.
[3.] 4. The Commission shall adopt regulations [providing]
establishing a schedule of fees for the [renewal] issuance of a
certificate of number and the renewal of the certificate by the
purchase of a validation decal. The [fee for a validation decal is
determined by] fees established pursuant to this subsection must:
(a) Be based on the straight line length of the power-driven
vessel [and] which is [equivalent] measured from the tip of the bow
to the [fee set forth in the schedule provided in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2. The amount] back of the transom of the power-driven
vessel;
-
*AB548*

– 4 –
(b) Be the same for the issuance and renewal; and
(c) Include a fee for issuing a duplicate validation decal . [is
$20.
4.] 5. The owner shall paint on or attach to each side of the
bow of the power-driven vessel the identification number in such a
manner as may be prescribed by regulations of the Commission in
order that the number may be clearly visible. The number must be
maintained in legible condition.
[5.] 6. The certificate of number must be available at all times
for inspection on the power-driven vessel for which issued,
whenever the power-driven vessel is in operation.
[6.] 7. The Commission shall provide by regulation for the
issuance of numbers to manufacturers and dealers which may be
used interchangeably upon power-driven vessels operated by the
manufacturers and dealers in connection with the demonstration,
sale or exchange of those power-driven vessels. The amount of the
fee for each such a number is $20.
Sec. 2. NRS 488.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.125 1. Every certificate of number awarded pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter shall continue in full force and effect
for a period of 1 year, or 2 years if allowed by regulations adopted
by the Commission, unless sooner terminated or discontinued in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
2. The fee for the issuance or renewal of a certificate of number
for 2 years, if allowed, is an amount which is equal to twice the
annual fee for the vessel set forth in [paragraph (b) of] the
regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to subsection [2]
4 of NRS 488.075.
3. Certificates of number may be renewed by the owner in
accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to subsection [3] 4 of
NRS 488.075.
Sec. 3. NRS 488.1793 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.1793 Except as otherwise provided for the creation or
transfer of a security interest or the transfer on death of a certificate
of ownership pursuant to NRS 488.1794, no transfer of title to or
any interest in any power-driven vessel required to be numbered
under this chapter is effective until one of the following conditions
is fulfilled:
1. The transferor has properly endorsed and delivered the
certificate of ownership and has delivered the certificate of number
to the transferee as provided in this chapter, and the transferee has,
within the prescribed time, delivered the documents to the
Department or placed them in the United States mail addressed to
the Department with the [transfer] fee [.] prescribed by the
Commission pursuant to NRS 488.1795.
-
*AB548*

– 5 –
2. The transferor has delivered to the Department or placed in
the United States mail addressed to the Department the appropriate
documents for the transfer of ownership pursuant to the sale or
transfer.
Sec. 4. NRS 488.1795 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.1795 1. The Commission shall adopt regulations
prescribing a fee for the transfer of title of a power-driven vessel.
2. Upon receipt of a properly endorsed certificate of ownership
and the certificate of number of any power-driven vessel, the
transferee shall within 10 days file with the Department the
certificates, accompanied by [a] the fee [of $20, with the
Department] prescribed pursuant to subsection 1, and thereby
make application for a new certificate of ownership and, when
required, a new certificate of number.
Sec. 5. NRS 387.1212 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1212 1. The State Education Fund is hereby created as a
special revenue fund to be administered by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction for the purpose of supporting the operation of the
public schools in this State. The interest and income earned on the
money in the Fund, excluding the direct legislative appropriation
from the State General Fund required by subsection 3, must, after
deducting any applicable charges, be credited to the Fund.
2. Money which must be deposited for credit to the State
Education Fund includes, without limitation:
(a) All money derived from interest on the State Permanent
School Fund, as provided in NRS 387.030;
(b) The proceeds of the tax imposed pursuant to NRS 244.33561
and any applicable penalty or interest, less any amount retained by
the county treasurer for the actual cost of collecting and
administering the tax;
(c) The proceeds of the tax imposed pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 387.195;
(d) The money identified in subsection 9 of NRS 120A.610;
(e) The portion of the money in each special account created
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 179.1187 which is identified in
paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of NRS 179.1187;
(f) The money identified in paragraph (d) of subsection 6 of
NRS 278C.250;
(g) The money identified in subsection 1 of NRS 328.450;
(h) The money identified in subsection 1 of NRS 328.460;
(i) The money identified in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.850;
(j) The money identified in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.855;
-
*AB548*

– 6 –
(k) The money required to be transferred to the State Education
Fund pursuant to NRS 362.100;
(l) The money required to be deposited to the credit of the State
Education Fund pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 362.170;
(m) The portion of the proceeds of the tax imposed pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 372A.290 identified in paragraph (b) of
subsection 4 of NRS 372A.290;
(n) The proceeds of the tax imposed pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 372A.290;
(o) The proceeds of the fees, taxes, interest and penalties
imposed pursuant to chapter 374 of NRS, as transferred pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 374.785;
(p) The money identified in subsection 5 of NRS 445B.640;
(q) The money identified in paragraph (b) of subsection 7 of
NRS 678B.390;
(r) The portion of the proceeds of the excise tax imposed
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 463.385 identified in paragraph (c)
of subsection 5 of NRS 463.385;
(s) The money required to be distributed to the State Education
Fund pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.181;
(t) The [portion of the proceeds of the fee imposed pursuant to
NRS 488.075] money identified in subsection [2] 3 of
NRS 488.075;
(u) The portion of the net profits of the grantee of a franchise,
right or privilege identified in NRS 709.110;
(v) The portion of the net profits of the grantee of a franchise
identified in NRS 709.230;
(w) The portion of the net profits of the grantee of a franchise
identified in NRS 709.270;
(x) The money required to be distributed to the State Education
Fund pursuant to NRS 363D.290;
(y) The amount of any fines required to be remitted to the State
Treasurer for deposit to the credit of the State Education Fund
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 555.470;
(z) The amount of any claim, together with any dividend,
interest or other increment required to be transferred to the State
Education Fund pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 120A.645;
(aa) The portion of the proceeds of the tax imposed pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 372A.290 identified in paragraph (b) of
subsection 5 of NRS 372A.290; and
(bb) The direct legislative appropriation from the State General
Fund required by subsection 3.
3. In addition to money from any other source provided by law,
support for the State Education Fund must be provided by direct
legislative appropriation from the State General Fund in an amount
-
*AB548*

– 7 –
determined by the Legislature to be sufficient to fund the operation
of the public schools in this State for kindergarten through grade 12
for the next ensuing biennium for the population reasonably
estimated for that biennium. Money in the State Education Fund
does not revert to the State General Fund at the end of a fiscal year,
and the balance in the State Education Fund must be carried forward
to the next fiscal year.
4. Money in the Fund must be paid out on claims as other
claims against the State are paid.
Sec. 6. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of this act,
the fees set forth in NRS 488.075 and 488.1795, as those sections
existed on June 30, 2025, remain in effect until the regulations
establishing fees pursuant to NRS 488.075 and 488.1795, as
amended by sections 1 and 4 of this act, respectively, are adopted by
the Board of Wildlife Commissioners and filed with the Secretary of
State.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB548*